Illinois, session 104th, HB1012.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Grain Code is amended by changing Section 51-5 as follows: 6    (240 ILCS 40/1-5)7    Sec. 1-5. Purpose. It is the the primary purpose of this 8Code to promote the State's welfare by improving the economic 9stability of agriculture through the existence of the Illinois 10Grain Insurance Fund in order to protect producers in the 11event of the failure of a licensed grain dealer or licensed 12warehouseman and to ensure the existence of an adequate 13resource so that persons holding valid claims may be 14compensated for losses occasioned by the failure of a licensed 15grain dealer or licensed warehouseman. To that end, this Code 16shall be liberally construed and liberally administered in 17favor of claimants.18    In addition, the Illinois grain industry comprises a 19significant and vital part of the State's economy and as such 20can function to its fullest competitive and profitable 21potential, thus contributing to the economic health of this 22State, when it operates under a coordinated and integrated 23regulatory structure. Thus, a further purpose of this Code is   HB1012- 2 -LRB104 04929 RPS 14956 b1to provide a single system of governmental regulation of the 2Illinois grain industry.3(Source: P.A. 93-225, eff. 7-21-03.)